Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Arizona game and fish department; livestock loss inspector One FTE position is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona game and fish department for a livestock loss inspector.